District of Columbia statutes.
5-804

Penalties in lieu of discipline for members in conditional retirement.

(a)

The Metropolitan Police Department shall set the level of discipline for a member in conditional retirement as if he or she continued to be a member of the Metropolitan Police Department.

(b)

A member in conditional retirement who would have received suspension as discipline had he or she remained a member of the Metropolitan Police Department, shall be assessed a penalty of not less than $100 and not greater than $5,000, depending on the length of suspension.

(c)

If a member in conditional retirement would have been terminated from the Metropolitan Police Department as discipline for serious misconduct the member shall be assessed a penalty of not less than $1,000 and not greater than $5,000 in the discretion of the Chief of Police, pursuant to written standards developed by the Chief of Police.

History

Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-160, § 505, 47 DCR 4619

Section References

This section is referenced in § 5-803, § 5-805, and § 5-806.